Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.715.030

Tuition—Fees—Admission—Enrollment priorities.

(1) A school that is the subject of a state-tribal education compact may not charge tuition except to the same extent as school districts may be permitted to do so with respect to out-of-state and adult students pursuant to chapter 28A.225 RCW, but may charge fees for participation in optional extracurricular events and activities.

(2) Such schools may not limit admission on any basis other than age group, grade level, or capacity and must otherwise enroll all students who apply.

(3) If capacity is insufficient to enroll all students who apply, a school that is the subject of a state-tribal education compact may prioritize the enrollment of tribal members and siblings of already enrolled students.

[ 2013 c 242 s 4.]